West Virginia, session 2026, SB715.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. CIVIL SERVICE SYSTEM. §29-6-28. First consideration in hiring for veterans of the U.S. armed forces and retired or disabled law-enforcement officers. (a) Any state agency or appointing authority shall give first consideration to hiring any veteran of the United States armed forces and any retired or disabled law-enforcement officer when considering applicants for employment with the state. (b) To receive first consideration pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, an applicant shall provide documentation, which may not include medical records, to the state agency or appointing authority as follows:(1) A veteran of the United States armed forces shall provide documentation validating his or her military service; and(2) A law-enforcement officer shall provide documentation validating his or her retirement or disability.(c) As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning specified in §6-13-1 of this code. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home